Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.100

Contributions—Distribution upon member's separation—Exemption from taxation and judicial process—Assignability—Exceptions.

(1) A member who separates from judicial service for any reason is entitled to receive a lump sum distribution of the member's accumulated contributions. The administrator for the courts may adopt rules establishing other payment options, in addition to lump sum distributions, if the other payment options conform to the requirements of the federal internal revenue code.

(2) The right of a person to receive a payment under this chapter and the moneys in the accounts created under this chapter are exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and are not subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency law, or any other process of law whatsoever and is not assignable, except as is otherwise specifically provided in this section.

(3) If a judgment, decree or other order, including a court-approved property settlement agreement, that relates to the provision of child support, spousal maintenance, or the marital property rights of a spouse or former spouse, child, or other dependent of a member is made pursuant to the domestic relations law of the state of Washington or such order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state, then the amount of the member's accumulated contributions shall be paid in the manner and to the person or persons so directed in the domestic relations order. However, this subsection does not permit or require a benefit to be paid or to be provided that is not otherwise available under the terms of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter. The administrator for the courts shall establish reasonable procedures for determining the status or any such decree or order and for effectuating distribution pursuant to the domestic relations order.

(4) The administrator for the courts may pay from a member's accumulated contributions the amount that the administrator finds is lawfully demanded under a levy issued by the internal revenue service with respect to that member or is sought to be collected by the United States government under a judgment resulting from an unpaid tax assessment against the member.

[ 2007 c 108 s 1; 1988 c 109 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.